Luganda.aff
# N7 = Class VII noun prefixes (olu-/olul-/olw- → en-/em-/enn-/enny- etc.)
#      e.g. olulimi → ennimi; olubuto → embuto; olwendo → ennyendo; oluggi → enziggi
# N8 = Class VIII noun prefixes (large stuff: omu-/omw- → ogu-/ogw-; some variants → aga-)
#      e.g. omuntu → oguntu
# N9 = Class IX noun prefixes (oku- nouns: oku- may drop, or pluralize with ama-/ma-)
#      e.g. okutu → kutu; okutu → amatu; okugulu → magulu
# Nx = Class X noun prefixes (otw-/otu- nouns; this rule encodes the allowed alternation)
#      e.g. otulo → tulo
# yy = Impersonal possessive prefix (e.g. ekitabo ky'abaana, eby'abaana)
# zz = Size-based noun prefixes (e.g. akamotoka, obumotoka, olwana)
#
# NOTE: For each word, you have to include the original stem 
# and its respective modified stems in the .dic file and apply only the applicable flags
# For example for the verb "lya" the entries might be:
# lya/PS      (apply PS subject markers for present tense)
# lya/NP      (apply NP subject markers for near past)
# lya/NN      (apply pre-generated PS x Ob cross product for subject+object)
# lidde/PS    (alternative stem form with PS markers)
# liisa/UU    (alternative stem form with special reflexive objects)
################# END OF DESCRIPTION OF FLAGS ##########################

SET UTF-8
FLAG long
LANG lg
TRY abcdefghijklmnoprstuvwyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPRSTUVWYZ

WORDCHARS '’ŋ

ICONV 1
ICONV  ’ '

NEEDAFFIX NA

COMPOUNDRULE 1
COMPOUNDRULE (C1)(C2)

ONLYINCOMPOUND OC

COMPOUNDFLAG CF

COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG CP

COMPOUNDBEGIN CB

COMPOUNDMIN 1

FORBIDDENWORD fw

WARN NR
FORBIDWARN


# Optional vowels at the begining of words e.g. akajanja-->kajanja 
PFX ea Y 3
PFX ea a 0 [aeiou]
PFX ea e 0 [aeiou]
PFX ea o 0 [aeiou]

# suffix "ko" in words like okulyako, okulabako, fumbako
# Was using flag A but now uses ko
SFX ko Y 1
SFX ko 0 ko [aeiou]

# suffix "mu" in words like tunulamu
# Was using flag O but now uses mu
SFX mu Y 1
SFX mu 0 mu [aeiou]

# suffix "yooko" e.g. tunulayooko
SFX yk Y 2
SFX yk 0 yooko ^yo
SFX yk yo yooko yo # faayo-->faayooko

# suffix "yo" e.g. gendayo
SFX yo Y 1
SFX yo 0 yo [aeiou]

# suffix "wo" e.g. tunulawo
SFX wo Y 1
SFX wo 0 wo [aeiou]

# vowels at the end of possesives e.g. "we" "abe" ke in sentence like abaana bo
SFX ae Y 3
SFX ae 0 a [^aeiou]
SFX ae 0 e [^aeiou]
SFX ae 0 o [^aeiou]

# A person who does an act e.g. omuli, omukubi, omwambazi
# It can also be used like the Luganda equivalent of English's "just"
# e.g. okulaba obulabi, kulya buli
# Was using flag o but now uses oo
PFX oo Y 39
PFX oo 0 mu [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 omu
PFX oo 0 ba  [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 aba [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 mi [^aeiou] 
PFX oo 0 emi [^aeiou] 
PFX oo 0 emy [aeiou]
PFX oo 0  nd [aeiou]
PFX oo 0  end [aeiou] #e.g. 0 i-->endi
PFX oo 0  nn [aeiou]
PFX oo 0  enn [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 n [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 en [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 ny [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 eny [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 ki [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 eki [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 ky [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 eky [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 bi [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 ebi [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 by [aeiou]
PFX oo 0 eby [aeiou]
PFX oo 0  dd [aeiou]
PFX oo 0  edd [aeiou]  #omulamuoi-->eddamuzi
PFX oo 0 ek omuk # omukubi-->ekkubi
PFX oo 0 emy [aeiou] #e.g. omwambazi-->emyambazi
PFX oo 0 ma [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 ama [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 ka omu
PFX oo 0 aka omu
PFX oo 0 ka [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 aka [^aeiou]
PFX oo 0 obu [^aeiou] # omuli-->obuli, omwambazi-->obwambazi
PFX oo 0 bu  [^aeiou]
PFX oo om lu [^aeiou]
PFX oo om olu [^aeiou]
PFX oo om oku [^aeiou]
PFX oo om otu [^aeiou]


# Reflexive verb form, subject markers in present simple tense 
# I think these can also work for the very near past, near and distant past tenses e.g beezimbira, beezimbidde
# Was using flag RD but now uses RP
PFX RP Y 35
PFX RP 0 nee .
PFX RP 0 wee .
PFX RP 0 yee .
PFX RP 0 twe .
PFX RP 0 mwe .
PFX RP 0 bee .
PFX RP 0 abee .
PFX RP 0 gwe .
PFX RP 0 ogwe .
PFX RP 0 gye .
PFX RP 0 egye .
PFX RP 0 zee .
PFX RP 0 ezee .
PFX RP 0 kye .
PFX RP 0 ekye .
PFX RP 0 bye .
PFX RP 0 ebye .
PFX RP 0 lye .
PFX RP 0 elye .
PFX RP 0 gee .
PFX RP 0 agee .
PFX RP 0 kee .
PFX RP 0 akee .
PFX RP 0 bwe .
PFX RP 0 obwe .
PFX RP 0 lwe .
PFX RP 0 olwe .
PFX RP 0 zee .
PFX RP 0 ezee .
PFX RP 0 kwe .
PFX RP 0 okwe .
PFX RP 0 gee .
PFX RP 0 agee .
PFX RP 0 twe .
PFX RP 0 otwe .

# present simple tense and very near past tense negative subject marker
# It also handles imperative negative e.g togenda!
# Was using flag sd but  now uses ps
PFX ps Y 34
PFX ps 0 si .
PFX ps 0 to .
PFX ps 0 ta .
PFX ps 0 ata .
PFX ps 0 tetu .
PFX ps 0 temu .
PFX ps 0 teba .
PFX ps 0 abata .
PFX ps 0 tegu .
PFX ps 0 oguta .
PFX ps 0 tegi .
PFX ps 0 egita .
PFX ps 0 te .
PFX ps 0 ete .
PFX ps 0 tezi .
PFX ps 0 ezita .
PFX ps 0 teki .
PFX ps 0 ekita .
PFX ps 0 tebi .
PFX ps 0 ebita .
PFX ps 0 teli .
PFX ps 0 elita .
PFX ps 0 tega .
PFX ps 0 agata .
PFX ps 0 teka .
PFX ps 0 akata .
PFX ps 0 tebu .
PFX ps 0 obuta .
PFX ps 0 telu .
PFX ps 0 oluta .
PFX ps 0 teku .
PFX ps 0 okuta .
PFX ps 0 tetu .
PFX ps 0 otuta .

# present simple tense and very near past tense negative subject marker to be used in relative pronoun words 
# e.g. gezitalaba, byessilya, byessilidde
PFX pS Y 19
PFX pS 0 ssi .
PFX pS 0 oto .
PFX pS 0 ata .
PFX pS 0 tuta .
PFX pS 0 muta .
PFX pS 0 bata .
PFX pS 0 guta .
PFX pS 0 gita .
PFX pS 0 ete .
PFX pS 0 zita .
PFX pS 0 kita .
PFX pS 0 bita .
PFX pS 0 lita .
PFX pS 0 gata .
PFX pS 0 kata .
PFX pS 0 buta .
PFX pS 0 luta .
PFX pS 0 kuta .
PFX pS 0 tuta .

# Near and distant past tense negative subject marker
# was using flag sb but now uses np
PFX np Y 33
PFX np 0 saa .
PFX np 0 tewa .
PFX np 0 teya .
PFX np 0 tetwa .
PFX np 0 temwa .
PFX np 0 tebaa .
PFX np 0 abataa .
PFX np 0 tegwa .
PFX np 0 ogutaa .
PFX np 0 tegya .
PFX np 0 egitaa .
PFX np 0 teya .
PFX np 0 etaa .
PFX np 0 tezaa .
PFX np 0 ezitaa .
PFX np 0 tekya .
PFX np 0 ekitaa .
PFX np 0 tebya .
PFX np 0 ebitaa .
PFX np 0 telya .
PFX np 0 elitaa .
PFX np 0 tegaa .
PFX np 0 agataa .
PFX np 0 tekaa .
PFX np 0 akataa .
PFX np 0 tebwa .
PFX np 0 obutaa .
PFX np 0 telwa .
PFX np 0 olutaa .
PFX np 0 tekwa .
PFX np 0 okutaa .
PFX np 0 tetwa .
PFX np 0 otutaa .

# Negative Subject markers for the near past and distant past to be used in the combination [object]+[subject]+[stem]
# I think its called relative pronouns in English
# gwemutaalabye
# Since the apostrophe is a breaking point, words like
# gw'otaalabye, z'ataalya are handled by creating independent words like otaalaba, otaalya which do not exist and may be 
# troublesome when generating suggestions but I think it can be solved using language tool
PFX nP Y 21
PFX nP 0 saa .
PFX nP 0 otoo .
PFX nP 0 otaa .
PFX nP 0 ataa .
PFX nP 0 etaa .
PFX nP 0 mutaa .
PFX nP 0 bataa .
PFX nP 0 gutaa .
PFX nP 0 gitaa .
PFX nP 0 zitaa .
PFX nP 0 kitaa .
PFX nP 0 bitaa .
PFX nP 0 litaa .
PFX nP 0 gataa .
PFX nP 0 kataa .
PFX nP 0 butaa .
PFX nP 0 lutaa .
PFX nP 0 zitaa .
PFX nP 0 kutaa .
PFX nP 0 gataa .
PFX nP 0 tutaa .

# Negative Subject markers for the near future 
# I think they can be used in questions e.g temuulabe? temuulye?
# Was using flag se but now uses nf
PFX nf Y 37
PFX nf 0 sii .
PFX nf 0 temuu .
PFX nf 0 too .
PFX nf 0 taa .
PFX nf 0 tetuu .
PFX nf 0 temuu .
PFX nf 0 tebaa .
PFX nf 0 abataa .
PFX nf 0 teguu .
PFX nf 0 ogutaa .
PFX nf 0 tegii .
PFX nf 0 egitaa .
PFX nf 0 tee .
PFX nf 0 tezii .
PFX nf 0 ezitaa .
PFX nf 0 tekii .
PFX nf 0 ekitaa .
PFX nf 0 tebii .
PFX nf 0 ebitaa .
PFX nf 0 telii .
PFX nf 0 elitaa .
PFX nf 0 tegaa .
PFX nf 0 agataa .
PFX nf 0 tekaa .
PFX nf 0 akataa .
PFX nf 0 tebuu .
PFX nf 0 obutaa .
PFX nf 0 teluu .
PFX nf 0 olutaa .
PFX nf 0 tezii .
PFX nf 0 ezitaa .
PFX nf 0 tekuu .
PFX nf 0 okutaa .
PFX nf 0 teguu .
PFX nf 0 ogutaa .
PFX nf 0 tetuu .
PFX nf 0 otutaa .
