Luganda.dic
abo/ea
aga/ea
ak/ea
aka/ea
akabasa/ea
akajanja/ea
akamunye/eabu
akatunguluccumu/ea
li/NApsnpRFrfggPSDPSCscWNwnStstLT
liko/NAnpRPPSDPWNwnStstSTsTNNGGBGBFBDBEBXEDEBEFEMFDFGwgWGWFSC
liiko/NApsrpSSIIBRSCscFGFHwfwgwhFE
limu/NAnpPSVPDPSCWNwnStstLTNNGGMMBGBFBDBEBXEHEDEBEFFGEMFD
liimu/NApsrpWNSSIIBRFGFHscFE
liwo/NAnpPSDPSCWNwnStstLTBG
liiwo/NApsscWN
limuuko/NAnpPSDPSCWNwmwnStstLTNNGGBGBFBDBXEBFEFGFHFP
liwooko/NAnpPSDPSCWNwnwmStstLTBG
liiwooko/NApssc
liyo/NAnpPSDPSCWNwnStstLT
liiyo/NApsscWN
liyooko/NAnpPSDPSCWNwnStstLT
liiyooko/NApssc
ba/NApsffggPSDPNFFFIPipYTSCscWNwnWMWFwfIMstStLTBIBGBDBHBEFC
baawo/psnpggPSDPNFFFIPipYTSCscWNwnWMWFwfIMStstLT
beewo/NAnfPTwmSB
baawooko/psnpffggPSDPNFFFIPipYTSCscWNwnWMWFwfCCIMStstLT
beewooko/NAnfPTwmSB
baayo/psnpffggPSDPNFFFIPipYTSCscWNwnWMWFwfCCStstLT
beeyo/NAnfPTwmSB
baako/RPpsnpffRnRFrfgghhrpPSDPNFFFIPRIriYTytSCscWNwnWMWFwfWGwgWHwhWJwjCCcCStstSTsTLTNNGGQQRRSSMMIITTxxvvBGBIBSBKBFBDBHBRBEBXFYEHFCFDEBEFFEFSFVFMFGFHFAEKEM
beeko/NARPnfPTwmWGwgWHNNWWBVBRBXFXFMFPEM
baayooko/psnpffggPSDPNFFFIPipYTSCscWNwnWMWFwfCCStstLT
beeyooko/NAnfPTwmSB
beemuuko/NAnfPTwmwgWHSBNNWWBVBXEM
baamuuko/psnpffRnRFgghhrpPSDPNFFFIPipRIriYTytSCscWNwnWMWFwfCCStstLTNNGGQQRRSSMMIIWWvvxxBGBIBSBKBFBDBHBRBEBXFYEHEDFCFDEBFEFSFVFMFGFHEKEM
faako/RPpsnpffRnRFrfgghhrpPSDPFFRIriYTytSCscWNWGwgWHWJwjiMSTsTRRNNGGSSMMIITTkkvvxxHHttllBGBIBSBKBVBFBQBWBDBHBRBEBXEHEDFCFDEBEFFEFSFVFMFGFAEKwnWMWFwfwhFH
feeko/NARPnfrpPSscwnwmwgwhSBWWBXFXFPEMFV
fuddeko/NARPnprpPSNPSCwgWGwhcCiMsTLTNNGGIIBGBFBDBEBXFYEHFDEFFHFGEKEMWNwn
fuddeeko/NApsrpWGwgFEFMFGscWNFP
fiireko/NARPnfrpPSFFwmwhSBNNWWUUBVBXFXFPFREMwgWGwjFLJQGCGIGQHCHKHLHYIAIB
fiiriddeko/NARPnpPSNPSCwgCCcCIMiMstLTNNGGMMIIUUVVBGBFBDBEFYFZEHEJFDFIFHFKFLEKELEMWNwnWGwhWJWHFGsc
fiiriddeeko/NApsrfrpscWNSSBSBVBRFRwhwgWGwfWMBUFEFJFGFKFN
faayo/psnpffggPSDPNFFFPPppIPipykYTSCscWNwnWMwmWFwfStstLTIM
feeyo/NAykwmSBPTsc
fuddeyo/NAPSyknpVPNPSCwnCCLTWN
fuddeeyo/NAykpsscWNWM
fiirayo/NARPpsnpffRnRFrfgghhrpPSVPDPNFFFPPppJJjjIPipRIYTytSCscWNWMWFwgWGWHWJwjIMStstSTsTLTwnwfwhwmiMEMFDFEFGFHFMFSFV
fiiriddeyo/NARPnprpPSDPipSCwnWGwgWFwhWNCCcCIMiMStstSTsTLTNNGGIIBGBXFYEHEDFDEBEFEKEMFH
fiiriddeeyo/NApsrpSCPSscWNwnSSBRFE
fumbi/oo
fumbo/oo
fumisi/oo
funzi/oo
fuuyizi/oo
gabi/oo
gabuzi/oo
gajambuzi/oo
gambi/oo
ganzi/oo
gassi/oo
gayaavu/oo
genzi/oo
ggazi/oo
ginzi/oo
goberezi/oo
gogozi/oo
golozi/oo
gonvu/oo
guzi/oo
gulumivu/oo
gumu/oo
gunzi/oo
gunjuzi/oo
gwi/oo
jeemu/oo
jjumbize/oo
julizi/oo
kasi/oo
kasusi/oo
kenzi/oo
kessi/oo
kimi/oo
kolimi/oo
kolobozi/oo
kolokosi/oo
kolozi/oo
kombi/oo
komozi/oo
kongozzi/oo
kongoozi/oo
konkonyi/oo
koonyi/oo
koowu/oo
kumi/oo
kumbi/oo
kunami/oo
kunguzi/oo
kwanyi/oo
omulabi/oo
lagajjavu/oo
liisa/RPgghh
liisizza/RP
